apertium-ssw.ssw.twol
Alphabet

 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z 

 %{u%}:0 %{a%}:a %{n%}:n 

 %>:0 ; 

Sets 

Vow = a e i o u ; 

Rules 

"umu- replaces um- before monosyllabic stems"
%{u%}:u <=> _ ; 

"delete n before m"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: :m ; 

"assimilation"
%{n%}:m <=> _ %>: :p ; 
